zh-TW: 支援級數: 可設定 (單段或多段); 多段 (4 段以上); 單段; 三段; 兩段; 其他
ja: 対応ステージ数: 設定可能 (シングルまたはマルチ); マルチステージ (4以上); シングルステージ; 3ステージ; 2ステージ; その他
de: Unterstützte Stufen: Konfigurierbar (ein- oder mehrstufig); Mehrstufig (4+); Einstufig; Dreistufig; Zweistufig; Sonstige
cs: Počet podporovaných stupňů: Konfigurovatelné (jedno nebo vícestupňové); Vícestupňové (4+); Jednostupňové; Třístupňové; Dvoustupňové; Jiné
sv: Stadier som stöds: Konfigurerbar (enkel eller fler); Flerstegs (4+); Enstegs; Trestegs; Tvåstegs; Övrigt
ru: Поддерживаемое количество ступеней: Настраиваемая (одна или несколько); Многоступенчатая (4+); Одноступенчатая; Трехступенчатая; Двухступенчатая; Другая
ko: 지원되는 단계: 구성 가능(단일 또는 다중); 다단계(4 이상); 단일 단계; 3단계; 2단계; 기타
da: Understøttede stadier: Konfigurerbar (enkelt eller multi); Flertrins (4+); Enkelttrins; Tretrins; Totrins; Andet
nb: Støttede stadier: Konfigurerbar (enkel eller flertrinns); Flertrinns (4+); Enkeltrinns; Tretrinns; Totrinns; Annet
en: Stages supported: Configurable (single or multi); Multi-stage (4+); Single-stage; Three-stage; Two-stage; Other
ro-RO: Trepte acceptate: Configurabil (unul sau mai multe); Mai multe stadii (4+); Un singur stadiu; Trei stadii; Două stadii; Altele
el: Αριθμός υποστηριζόμενων σταδίων: Ρυθμιζόμενο (μονό ή πολλαπλό); Πολλαπλών σταδίων (4+); Ενός σταδίου; Τριών σταδίων; Δύο σταδίων; Άλλο
sl-SI: Podprte stopnje: Nastavljivo (enostopenjsko ali večstopenjsko); Večstopenjsko (4+); Enostopenjsko; Tristopenjsko; Dvostopenjsko; Drugo
fi: Tuetut vaiheet: Muunneltava (yksi tai useampi); Monivaiheinen (4+); Yksivaiheinen; Kolmivaiheinen; Kaksivaiheinen; Muu
th: เวทีที่ได้รับการสนับสนุน: กำหนดค่าได้ (เดี่ยวหรือหลายระดับ); หลายระดับ (4+); ระดับเดียว; สามระดับ; สองระดับ; อื่นๆ
tr: Desteklenen aşamalar: Yapılandırılabilir (tek veya çoklu); Çok aşamalı (4+); Tek aşamalı; Üç aşamalı; İki aşamalı; Diğer
zh-CN: 火箭级数: 可配置（单级或多级）; 多级 (4+); 单级; 三级; 两级; 其他
hr-HR: Podržane faze: Podesivo (jednostupanjsko ili višestupanjsko); Višestupanjsko (4+); Jednostupanjsko; Trostupanjsko; Dvostupanjsko; Ostalo
it: Stadi supportati: Configurabile (singolo o multiplo); Multistadio (4+); Monostadio; A tre stadi; A due stadi; Altro
es: Etapas compatibles: Configurable (una o múltiples); Múltiples etapas (4+); Una etapa; Tres etapas; Dos etapas; Otro
lt-LT: Palaikomi etapai: Konfigūruojama (viena arba kelios); Daugiapakopė (4+); Vienos pakopos; Trijų pakopų; Dviejų pakopų; Kita
bg-BG: Поддържани етапи: Конфигурируеми (едно- или многостепенни); Многостепенни (4+); Едностепенни; Тристепенни; Двустепенни; Друго
pt-PT: Número de estágios suportados: Configurável (simples ou múltiplo); Múltiplos estágios (4+); Estágio único; Três estágios; Dois estágios; Outro
vi: Các giai đoạn được hỗ trợ: Có thể cấu hình (đơn hoặc đa); Nhiều giai đoạn (4+); Một giai đoạn; Ba giai đoạn; Hai giai đoạn; Khác
pl: Obsługiwane odcinki: Konfigurowalne (jedno- lub wielostopniowe); Wielostopniowe (4+); Jednostopniowe; Trzystopniowe; Dwustopniowe; Inne
nl: Ondersteunde stadia: Configureerbaar (enkel of meervoudig); Meertraps (4+); Eentraps; Drietraps; Tweetraps; Overige
sk-SK: Podporované stupne: Konfigurovateľné (jednostupňové alebo viacstupňové); Viacstupňové (4+); Jednostupňové; Trojstupňové; Dvojstupňové; Iné
fr: Étages compatibles: Configurable (mono ou multi); Multi-étapes (4+); Mono-étape; Trois étapes; Deux étapes; Autre
hu: Támogatott szakaszok: Konfigurálható (egy- vagy többlépcsős); Többlépcsős (4+); Egylépcsős; Háromlépcsős; Kétlépcsős; Egyéb
pt-BR: Estágios compatíveis: Configurável (estágio único ou múltiplo); Múltiplos estágios (4 ou mais); Estágio único; Três estágios; Dois estágios; Outro